Montana, session 2025, SB44.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Separation of powers doctrine -- government powers generally --
limits. (1) The powers of the LEGISLATIVE BRANCH, THE executive branch, and THE judicial branch are limited to
those enumerated in the Montana constitution and granted by law.
(2) The legislature may not enact a law that is contrary to the constitution or exercise
executive branch powers provided for in [section 5] or judicial branch powers provided for in [section 6].
(3) The executive branch may not exercise legislative branch powers provided for in [sections 2
through 4] or judicial branch powers provided for in [section 6].
(4) The judicial branch may not:
(a) exercise legislative branch powers provided for in [sections 2 through 4];
(b) amend the effective date of an act of the legislature before the law becomes effective;
(c) declare a law unenforceable as applied toward anyone other than the parties involved
in a case or controversy; or
(d) exercise executive branch powers provided for in [section 5].
(5) The power of the board of regents is defined as provided in [section 7].
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 44

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0044.2
(6) The power of the board of public education is limited as provided in [section 7].

NEW SECTION. SECTION 2. LEGISLATIVE BRANCH POWER. ARTICLE V OF THE MONTANA
CONSTITUTION VESTS THE LEGISLATURE WITH POWER THAT CANNOT BE EXERCISED BY OTHER
BRANCHES OF GOVERNMENT. THIS POWER IS EXERCISED THROUGH A LEGISLATURE CONSISTING
OF A SENATE AND A HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES. THE LEGISLATURE'S POWER INCLUDES BUT IS
NOT LIMITED TO THE AUTHORITY TO:
(1) increase the limit on the length of a subsequent legislative session;
(2) enact, amend, and repeal statutes;
(3) appropriate money;
(4) enact laws to ensure the continuity of government during a period of emergency
without regard for other provisions of the constitution;
(5) adopt a code of ethics prohibiting conflict between public duty and private interest for
members of the legislature and all state and local officers and employees;
(6) overrule the governor's veto of a bill as authorized by Article VI, section 10, of the
Montana constitution;
(7) make recommendations concerning a districting and apportionment plan before it
becomes law;
(8) make joint rules of the legislature;
(9) interpret the joint rules of the legislature without interference from any other branch of
government;
(10) regulate certain activities of the judicial branch, including:
(a) disapproving rules of procedure promulgated by the supreme court in either of the two sessions
following promulgation;
(b) as authorized by Article VII, section 6, of the Montana constitution, changing the
number and boundaries of judicial districts and the number of judges in each district; and
(c) as authorized by Article VII, section 11, of the Montana constitution, creating a judicial
standards commission and providing for statutory exceptions to judicial confidentiality;
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 44

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0044.2
(11) refer measures to the people and regulate elections, including:
(a) referring any act of the legislature, except an appropriation of money, to the people for
approval;
(b) referring proposed amendments to the Montana constitution to the people for
ratification;
(c) ordering a special election for initiative and referendum measures;
(d) specifying by law the requirements for residence, registration, absentee voting, and
administration of elections;
(e) providing, at the option of the legislature, a system of poll booth registration;
(f) ensuring the purity of elections and guarding against abuses of the electoral process; and
(g) as authorized by Article IV, section 4, of the Montana constitution, specifying additional
qualifications for any public office;
(12) monitor and exercise legislative oversight over other branches of government,
including:
(a) establishing a legislative council and other interim committees;
(b) auditing state and local government finances and programs; and
(c) investigating any subject relevant to the proper discharge of the legislature's function;
(13) specify by law the grounds for impeachment;
(14) select by law the tribunal to hear and resolve impeachment charges;
(15) tax, borrow, and otherwise raise revenue, including but not limited to:
(a) providing for property tax exemptions;
(b) providing independent appeal procedures for taxpayer grievances;
(c) as authorized by Article VIII, section 8, of the Montana constitution, authorizing state
debt;
(d) limiting debts of counties, cities, towns, and all other local government entities;
(e) ensuring strict accountability of all revenue received and money spent by the state and
counties, cities, towns, and all other local government entities; and
(f) providing for a unified investment program for public funds, a public retirement system,
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 44

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0044.2
and state workers compensation insurance fund assets; and
(16) enact laws governing, and to be implemented by, the board of regents and the board of
public education.

NEW SECTION. SECTION 3. LEGISLATIVE BRANCH POWER -- HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES HAS SOLE POWER TO:
(1) judge the election and qualifications of its members;
(2) choose its officers from among its members;
(3) keep a journal;
(4) adopt, amend, repeal, and interpret rules governing its proceedings; and
(5) impeach public officers.

NEW SECTION. SECTION 4. LEGISLATIVE BRANCH POWER -- SENATE. THE SENATE HAS
SOLE POWER TO:
(1) judge the election and qualifications of its members;
(2) choose its officers from among its members;
(3) keep a journal;
(4) adopt, amend, repeal, and interpret rules governing its proceedings; and
(5) confirm appointments made by the governor for the following:
(a) vacancies in the supreme court and district courts, as authorized by Article VII, section
8, of the Montana constitution;
(b) regents of higher education, as authorized by Article X, section 9(2)(b), of the Montana
constitution;
(c) members of the board of public education, as authorized by Article X, section 9(3)(b), of the
Montana constitution;
(d) commissioner of the department of labor, as authorized by Article XII, section 2(1); and
(e) all other officers provided for in the constitution or by law whose appointment or election is not
otherwise provided, as authorized by Article VI, section 8, of the Montana constitution.
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 44

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0044.2

NEW SECTION. SECTION 5. EXECUTIVE BRANCH POWER. ARTICLE VI OF THE MONTANA
CONSTITUTION VESTS THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH WITH POWER THAT CANNOT BE EXERCISED BY
OTHER BRANCHES OF GOVERNMENT. THIS POWER IS EXERCISED THROUGH A GOVERNOR,
LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR, SECRETARY OF STATE, ATTORNEY GENERAL, SUPERINTENDENT OF
PUBLIC INSTRUCTION, AUDITOR, BOARD OF REGENTS, AND BOARD OF PUBLIC EDUCATION. THE
EXECUTIVE POWER INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING:
(1) the authority of the governor to:
(a) faithfully execute laws;
(b) as authorized by Article VI, section 6, of the Montana constitution, fill a vacancy by
appointment in the office of lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney general, superintendent of public
instruction, or auditor;
(c) as authorized by Article VI, section 8, of the Montana constitution, appoint all officers
provided for in the constitution or by law whose appointment or election is not otherwise specified;
(d) as authorized by Article VI, section 9, of the Montana constitution, submit a budget to
the legislature setting forth in detail all operating funds, proposed expenditures, and estimated revenue of the
state;
(e )convene a special session of the legislature;
(f) as authorized by Article VI, section 10, of the Montana constitution, veto certain bills of
the legislature;
(g) grant reprieves, commutations and pardons, restore citizenship, and suspend and
remit fines and forfeitures subject to procedures provided by law;
(h) act as commander-in-chief of the militia forces of the state;
(i) require information in writing, under oath when necessary, from the officers of the
executive branch and officers and managers of state institutions;
(j) appoint a committee to investigate and report on the condition of any executive office
or state institution;
(k) as authorized by Article VII, section 8, of the Montana constitution, appoint a
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – SB 44

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0044.2
replacement for any vacancy in the office of supreme court justice or district court judge from nominees
selected in the manner provided by law;
(l)serve on the board of land commissioners;
(m) serve as an ex officio member of the board of regents and the board of public
education, with power to break a tie vote of the state board of education;
(n) as authorized by Article X, section 9, of the Montana constitution, appoint members of
the board of regents and the board of public education; and
(o) perform duties provided in the Montana constitution and by law;
(2) the authority of the lieutenant governor to:
(a) perform the duties provided by the governor;
(b) as authorized by Article VI, section 14, of the Montana constitution, assume the power
of the governor during a vacancy in that office; and
(c)perform any other duties provided by law;
(3) the authority of the secretary of state to:
(a) maintain official records of the executive branch as provided by law;
(b) maintain official records of the legislature as provided by law;
(c) as authorized by Article III, section 4, of the Montana constitution, administer the filing
and certification of citizen initiative petitions;
(d) as authorized by Article III, section 5, of the Montana constitution, administer the filing
and certification of citizen referendum petitions to approve or reject an act of the legislature;
(e) as authorized by Article III, section 7, of the Montana constitution, submit an initiative or
referendum to the qualified electors at the next regularly scheduled statewide election when a ballot measure is
declared invalid because the election was improperly conducted;
(f) as authorized by Article XIV, section 2, of the Montana constitution, administer the
certification and filing of citizen petitions calling for a convention to revise, alter, or amend the Montana
constitution;
(g) as authorized by Article XIV, section 9, of the Montana constitution, provide for the
filing of citizen initiative petitions to amend the Montana constitution;
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – SB 44

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0044.2
(h) as authorized by Article IV, section 8, of the Montana constitution, enforce certain term
limits through a ballot certification process;
(i) maintain plans filed by a districting and apportionment commission;
(j) as authorized by Article VI, section 10, of the Montana constitution, conduct a veto
override poll for certain acts of the legislature when it is not in session;
(k) keep the great seal of the state;
(l) serve on the board of land commissioners; and
(m) perform any other duties provided by law;
(4) the authority of the attorney general to:
(a)serve as the chief legal officer of the state;
(b) serve on the board of land commissioners;
(c) as authorized by Article VI, section 14, of the Montana constitution, inform the
legislature when the governor is unable to discharge the powers and duties of that office; and
(d) perform any other duties provided by law;
(5) the authority of the superintendent of public instruction to:
(a) serve on the board of land commissioners;
(b) serve as an ex officio member of the board of regents and the board of public
education; and
(c) perform any other duties provided by law;
(6) the authority of the auditor to:
(a) serve on the board of land commissioners; and
(b) perform any other duties provided by law;
(7) the authority of the board of regents to perform duties provided by law and [section 7];
and
(8) the authority of the board of public education to perform duties provided by law and
[section 7].

NEW SECTION. SECTION 6. JUDICIAL BRANCH POWER. (1) ARTICLE VII OF THE MONTANA
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – SB 44

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0044.2
CONSTITUTION VESTS THE JUDICIAL BRANCH WITH POWER THAT CANNOT BE EXERCISED BY
OTHER BRANCHES OF GOVERNMENT. THIS POWER IS EXERCISED THROUGH A SUPREME COURT,
DISTRICT COURTS, JUSTICE COURTS, AND OTHER COURTS AS MAY BE PROVIDED BY STATE
STATUTE. THE JUDICIAL POWER INCLUDES:
(a) the authority to:
(i) as authorized by Article II, section 7, of the Montana constitution, instruct juries in suits
for defamation;
(ii) as authorized by Article II, section 16, of the Montana constitution, provide a speedy
remedy for every injury of person, property, or character unless limited by a workers' compensation law;
(iii) as authorized by Article II, section 20, of the Montana constitution, oversee the
prosecution of criminal offense laws;
(iv) as authorized by Article II, section 29, of the Montana constitution, account for funds
received in litigation through eminent domain;
(v) as authorized by Article II, section 30, of the Montana constitution, hear confessions
regarding treason against the state;
(vi) as authorized by Article IV, section 2, of the Montana constitution, determine if a
person is disqualified from being a qualified elector because of a current sentence for a felony or an unsound
mind;
(vii) as authorized by Article IV, section 7, of the Montana constitution, oversee a
preelection challenge to the procedure by which an initiative or referendum qualified for the ballot or a
postelection challenge in the manner provided by law;
(viii) as authorized by Article VII, section 4(3), of the Montana constitution, try and determine
contested elections as provided by law; and
(ix) as authorized by Article V, section 10, of the Montana constitution, exercise jurisdiction
that is provided to courts by law;
(b) the authority of the supreme court to:
(i) as authorized by Article V, section 14(2), of the Montana constitution, select a fifth
member of the districting and apportionment commission when the four members of the commission fail to
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – SB 44

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0044.2
make a selection;
(ii) exercise appellate jurisdiction and issue, hear, and determine writs appropriate to appellate
jurisdiction;
(iii) exercise original jurisdiction to issue, hear, and determine writs of habeas corpus;
(iv) exercise original jurisdiction over the writs as specified by statute;
(v) exercise supervisory control over all other state courts;
(vi) make rules governing appellate procedure, practice and procedure for all other state
courts, admission to the bar, and the conduct of licensed attorneys;
(vii) enact rules of procedure, subject to disapproval by the legislature in either of the two sessions
following promulgation;
(viii) substitute a district court judge in the event of disqualification or disability of the chief justice or
a justice;
(ix) as authorized by Article VII, section 11, of the Montana constitution, retire any justice or
judge for a disability that seriously interferes with the performance of duties; and
(x) as authorized by Article VII, section 11, of the Montana constitution, censure, suspend,
or remove any justice or judge for willful misconduct in office, willful and persistent failure to perform duties,
violation of canons of judicial ethics adopted by the court, or habitual intemperance;
(c) the authority of a district court to:
(i) exercise original jurisdiction in all criminal cases amounting to felony and all civil matters and
cases at law and in equity;
(ii) issue all writs appropriate to its jurisdiction;
(iii) exercise the power of naturalization;
(iv) exercise jurisdiction delegated by a state statute;
(v) hear appeals from inferior courts as trials anew unless otherwise provided by a state
statute; and
(vi) review decisions of administrative agencies when provided by a state statute; and
(d) the authority of a justice court to exercise original jurisdiction that is provided by a state statute.
(2) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:
- 9 - Authorized Print Version – SB 44

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0044.2
(a) "Appellate jurisdiction" means the review of a decision of the district court or other lower court
as provided by a state statute.
(b) "Eminent domain" has the same meaning as provided in 70-30-101.
(c) "Felony" has the same meaning as provided in 45-2-101.
(d) "Original jurisdiction" means the authority of a court to hear, determine, and render
judgment on a case or controversy for the first time.
(e) "Person" has the same meaning as provided in 1-1-201.
(f) "Property" has the same meaning as provided in 1-1-205.
(g) "Supervisory control" means an extraordinary court remedy that is sometimes justified
when urgency or emergency factors exist making the normal appeal process inadequate, when the case
involves purely legal questions, and when one or more of the following circumstances exist:
(i) the other court is proceeding under a mistake of law and is causing a gross injustice;
(ii) constitutional issues of statewide importance are involved; or
(iii) the other court grants or denies a motion for substitution of a judge in a criminal case.
(h) "Treason" means levying war against the state or adhering to enemies of the state by
giving them aid and comfort.
(i) "Writ" means an order in writing issued in the name of the state or of a court or judicial
officer.
(j) "Writ of habeas corpus" means a court order directed at the custodian of an individual
petitioner to produce the petitioner before the court for the purpose of determining the following:
(i) whether the petitioner is unlawfully imprisoned or restrained of liberty;
(ii) the reason why the imprisonment or restraint is unlawful; and
(iii) where and by whom the petitioner is confined or restrained.

NEW SECTION.Section 7. Executive branch power of board of regents and board of public
education -- definitions. (1) The board of regents and the board of public education are agencies of the
executive branch of state government. As such, they are required to enforce, within their respective spheres,
laws adopted by the legislature or by the people.
- 10 - Authorized Print Version – SB 44

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0044.2
(2) The oversight of the Montana University System entrusted by the state constitution to the board
of regents refers to the kind of oversight customarily exercised by executive branch officers over operations
assigned to them and does not extend to overriding state statutes. The board of regents' power regarding the
government, control, supervision, coordination, and management of the university system and other public
educational institutions is assigned by law.
(3) The duties entrusted by the state constitution to the board of public education are limited to
executive branch functions and do not extend to overriding state statutes. The board of public education
exercises general supervision over the public school system and other public educational institutions as
assigned by law.
(4) The rights of the people protected in the United States and Montana constitutions extend fully
to geographical areas under the control of the board of regents and the board of public education. The boards
are obligated to respect and protect those rights and to implement laws that protect or enhance them.
(5) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Board of public education" means the board of public education created in Article X, section
9(3), of the Montana constitution and 2-15-1507.
(b) "Board of regents" means the board of regents of higher education established by Article X,
section 9(2), of the Montana constitution and 2-15-1505.
(c) "Coordination" means the process of organizing people or groups so that they work together
properly and well.
(d) "General supervision" means general instructions are given and tasks are undertaken to
achieve required outcomes or objectives.
(e) "Government" means the authority to supervise, coordinate, manage, and control.
(f) "Manage" or "management" means an activity inclusive of control that is performed on a daily
basis.
(g) "Supervision" means regular monitoring of the administrative, clinical, or clerical work
performance of a staff member, trainee, student, volunteer, or employee on contract by a person with the
authority to give direction and require change.

- 11 - Authorized Print Version – SB 44

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0044.2
Section 8. Section 2-15-1505, MCA, is amended to read:
"2-15-1505. Board of regents of higher education. (1) The board of regents of higher education
created in Article X, section 9, subsection (2), of the Montana constitution consists of seven members
appointed by the governor and confirmed by the senate. The governor, superintendent of public instruction, and
commissioner of higher education are ex officio nonvoting members of the board of regents.
(2) The board of regents is an executive agency of government and as such is charged with
complying with and enforcing state law within the scope of its jurisdiction as provided in [section 7]."

Section 9. Section 2-15-1507, MCA, is amended to read:
"2-15-1507. Board of public education. (1) The board of public education created in Article X, section
9, subsection (3), of the Montana constitution consists of seven members appointed by the governor and
confirmed by the senate. The governor, superintendent of public instruction, and commissioner of higher
education are ex officio nonvoting members of the board of public education.
(2) The board of public education is an executive agency of government and as such is charged
with complying with and enforcing state law within the scope of its jurisdiction as provided in [section 7]."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 7 SECTION 1] are IS
intended to be codified as a new AN INTEGRAL part of Title 1, chapter 1, and the provisions of Title 1, chapter 1,
apply to [sections 1 through 7 SECTION 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 12 - Authorized Print Version – SB 44